Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB123.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302(k) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 amended to read:Section 302. Powers and Duties of County Boards.--The county boards of elections, within their respective counties, shall exercise, in the manner provided by this act, all powers granted to them by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon them by this act, which shall include the following:* * *(k) To receive from district election officers the returns of all primaries and elections, to canvass and compute the same using ranked choice voting as provided under section 604.1 in a county, city, borough, township, school district or other municipality or incorporated district contained in any county that has chosen to use the ranked choice voting method of computation, and to certify, no later than the third Monday following the primary or election, the results thereof to the Secretary of the Commonwealth, as may be provided by law, and to such other authorities as may be provided by law. The certification shall include the number of votes received in each election district by each candidate for the General Assembly.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 604.1. Authorization of Ranked Choice Voting in Municipal Elections.--(a) (1) The governing body of a county, city, borough, township, school district or other municipality or incorporated district contained in any county may, by ordinance or resolution or ballot initiative, authorize the use of the ranked choice voting method in elections conducted during the municipal primary and in the ensuing municipal election for any of its offices in accordance with the provisions of this section.20250HB0123PN2557 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The authorization described in paragraph (1) must occur not later than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the election for which the ranked choice voting method will be utilized.(b) (1) For offices subject to the ranked choice voting method, the ballot shall be simple and easy to understand and allow a voter to rank candidates for an office in order of choice. A voter may include no more than one write-in candidate among the voter's ranked choices for each office.(2) With respect to the ballot used in a ranked choice voting election:(i) In a contest conducted by ranked choice voting, the ballot shall allow voters to rank candidates in order of choice.(ii) The ballot shall allow voters to rank as many choices as there are qualified candidates, including qualified write-in candidates, except as provided in this section. If the voting equipment cannot accommodate a number of rankings on the ballot equal to the number of qualified candidates, the Secretary of the Commonwealth may limit the number of choices a voter may rank on a ballot to the maximum number allowed by the equipment. If multiple types of voting equipment are used in an election for the same office, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall ensure that every ballot allows voters to rank the same number of candidates.(iii) Instructions on the ballot must conform substantially to the following specifications, subject to usability testing and modification based on ballot design and voting system:Vote by indicating your first-choice candidate and ranking additional candidates in order of preference. Indicate your first choice by marking the number "1" beside a candidate's 20250HB0123PN2557 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 name, your second choice by marking the number "2" beside a candidate's name, your third choice by marking the number "3" beside a candidate's name, and so on. Rank as many choices as you wish. Indicating second and later preferences will not count against your first choice. Do not skip numbers, and do not mark the same number beside more than one candidate.(c) In a contest for one office conducted by ranked choice voting, each ballot shall count as one vote for the highest-ranked active candidate on that ballot. Tabulation shall proceed in rounds, with each round proceeding sequentially as follows:(1) If two or fewer active candidates remain, the candidate with the greatest number of votes is elected and tabulation is complete.(2) If more than two active candidates remain, the active candidate with the fewest votes is defeated, votes for the defeated candidate are transferred to each ballot's next-ranked active candidate, and a new round shall begin under paragraph (1).(d) In a contest for more than one office conducted by ranked choice voting, each ballot shall count, at its current transfer value, for the highest-ranked active candidate on that ballot. Tabulation shall proceed in rounds. Each round proceeds sequentially, until tabulation is complete, as follows:(1) If the number of elected candidates or the sum of the number of elected candidates and the number of active candidates is less than or equal to the number of seats to be filled, then all active candidates are designated as elected, and tabulation is complete. Otherwise, the tabulation shall proceed under paragraph (2).(2) If an active candidate has a number of votes greater 20250HB0123PN2557 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 than or equal to the election threshold for the contest, the candidate shall be designated as elected. Each ballot counting for an elected candidate shall be assigned a new transfer value by multiplying the ballot's current transfer value by the surplus fraction for the elected candidate, truncated after the fourth decimal place. Each candidate elected under this paragraph shall be deemed to have a number of votes equal to the election threshold for the contest in each future round and a new round shall begin under paragraph (1).(3) If no candidate is elected under paragraph (2), the candidate with the fewest votes is defeated and votes for the defeated candidates shall be transferred at their current transfer value to each ballot's next-ranked active candidate and a new round shall begin under paragraph (1).(e) If, in a round of counting conducted under subsection (d), two or more candidates have a number of surplus votes greater than the election threshold for the contest, the surpluses shall be distributed in rounds in which the largest surplus is distributed first, with any ties resolved by lot. The Secretary of the Commonwealth may modify the procedure to distribute surplus votes simultaneously in the same round, if the modification is made prior to the election.(f) (1) In any round of tabulation in a contest conducted by ranked choice voting, an inactive ballot shall not count for any candidate. A ballot shall be inactive if any of the following applies:(i) The ballot does not contain any active candidates and is not an undervote.(ii) The ballot has reached an overvote.(iii) The ballot has reached two consecutive skipped 20250HB0123PN2557 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rankings.(2) An undervote shall not count as an active or inactive ballot in any round of tabulation.(g) (1) In a contest conducted by ranked choice voting, the Secretary of the Commonwealth may modify the tabulation to include batch elimination. If the tabulation includes batch elimination, in any round that is eligible for batch elimination where the active candidate with the fewest votes would be defeated, each active candidate in the elimination batch shall be simultaneously defeated instead. An active candidate is in the elimination batch if the number of elected and active candidates with more votes than the candidate is greater than the number of offices to be elected, and it is mathematically impossible for the candidate to be elected for any of the following reasons:(i) The candidate could not win because the candidate's current vote total plus all votes that could possibly be transferred to the candidate in future rounds would not be enough to equal or surpass the active candidate with the next higher current vote total.(ii) The candidate has a lower current vote total than an active candidate in subparagraph (i).(2) Rounds eligible for batch elimination are either:(i) The first round of tabulation.(ii) A round consisting solely of eliminating one or more write-in candidates.(h) If two or more candidates are tied with the fewest votes and tabulation cannot continue until the candidate with the fewest votes is defeated, the defeated candidate shall be determined by lot. Election officials may resolve prospective 20250HB0123PN2557 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ties between candidates prior to tabulation after all votes are cast.(i) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall promulgate rules or guidance to facilitate the release of unofficial preliminary round-by-round results and unofficial preliminary cast vote records as soon as feasible after the polls close and at regular intervals thereafter until the counting of ballots is complete. The following shall apply:(1) Unofficial preliminary round-by-round results shall be clearly labeled as preliminary and, to the extent feasible, shall include the percent of ballots counted to date.(2) Unofficial preliminary cast vote records shall be:(i) clearly labeled as preliminary and, to the extent feasible, shall include the percent of ballots counted to date;(ii) published online in a publicly accessible, electronic format; and(iii) published in a manner consistent with the need to maintain voter privacy.(3) In adopting rules or guidance under this subsection, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall consult with and allow for input from county clerks, local election officials and national and State party representatives.(4) In addition to any other information required by law to be reported with final results, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall make public:(i) The total number of votes each candidate received in each round of the official tabulation, including votes for withdrawn candidates.(ii) The total number of ballots that became inactive in each round because the ballots did not contain any active 20250HB0123PN2557 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 candidates, reached an overvote or reached two consecutive skipped rankings, reported as separate figures.(iii) The cast vote records in a publicly accessible, electronic format and by precinct, published in a manner consistent with the need to maintain voter privacy.(j) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this act.(k) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Active candidate." A candidate who has not been defeated or elected."Election threshold." The number of votes sufficient for a candidate to be elected in a multiwinner contest, calculated by dividing the total number of votes counting for active candidates in the first round by the sum of one plus the number of offices to be filled, rounding up to the nearest whole number."Highest-ranked active candidate." The active candidate assigned to a higher ranking than any other active candidate."Inactive ballots." Ballots that do not count for any candidate for any of the reasons under subsection (f)(1)."Overvote." An instance in which a voter has ranked more than one candidate at the same ranking."Ranking." The number available to be assigned by a voter to a candidate to express the voter's choice for the candidate, beginning with the number "1" as the highest ranking."Round." An instance of the sequence of voting tabulation beginning with subsection (c)(1) for single winner contests or subsection (d)(1) for multiwinner contests.20250HB0123PN2557 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Skipped ranking." A voter has left a ranking unassigned but ranks a candidate at a subsequent ranking."Surplus fraction." A number equal to the quotient of the difference between an elected candidate's vote total and the election threshold, divided by the candidate's vote total, rounded up to four decimal places."Transfer value." The proportion of a vote that a ballot will contribute to the ballot's highest-ranked active candidate, with each ballot beginning with a transfer value of 1."Undervote." A ballot that does not contain any candidates at any ranking in a particular contest.Section 3. Sections 922, 1002(a) introductory paragraph, 1112-A(b)(2) and (3) and 1215(b) and (c) of the act are amended to read:Section 922. Which Candidates Nominated.--Candidates of the various political parties for nomination, except for the office of President of the United States, and except in a county, city, borough, township, school district or other municipality or incorporated district contained in any county, using ranked choice voting as described in section 604.1, who receive a plurality of votes of their party electors in the State, or in the political district, as the case may be, at the primary election, together with the candidates for the office of presidential elector nominated as herein provided, shall be candidates of their respective parties, and it shall be the duty of the proper county boards to print their names upon the official ballots and ballot labels at the succeeding election: Provided, That when a candidate for nomination shall have died before or on the day of the primary election and shall nevertheless receive a plurality of votes of his party electors 20250HB0123PN2557 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cast for the office for which he sought nomination, then no candidate shall have been nominated for the office at such primary and a substituted nomination may be made in the manner hereinafter provided.Section 1002. Form of Official Primary Ballot.--(a) [At] Except in elections when ranked choice voting is used as described in section 604.1, at primaries separate official ballots shall be prepared for each party which shall be in substantially the following form:* * *Section 1112-A. Election Day Procedures and the Process of Voting.--* * *(b) In an election district which uses an electronic voting system which utilizes paper ballots or ballot cards to register the votes, the following procedures will be applicable for the conduct of the election at the election district:* * *(2) At primary elections, except when ranked choice voting is used as described in section 604.1, the voter shall vote for the candidates of his choice for nomination, according to the number of persons to be voted for by him, for each office by making a cross (X) or check (✓) mark or by making a punch or mark sense mark in the square opposite the name of the candidate or by otherwise indicating a selection associated with the candidate, or he may so indicate on the ballot that the voter is electing to write in the name of a person for the particular office, and insert the identification of the office in question and the name of any person not already listed as a candidate for that office, and such indication and insertion shall count as a vote for that person for such office.20250HB0123PN2557 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) At all other elections, except when ranked choice voting is used as described in section 604.1, the voter shall vote for the candidates of his choice for each office to be filled, according to the number of persons to be voted for by him for each office, by making a cross (X) or check (✓) mark or by making a punch or mark sense mark in the square opposite the name of the candidate, or by otherwise indicating a selection associated with the candidate, or he may so indicate on the ballot that the voter is electing to write in the name of a person for the particular office, and insert the identification of the office in question and the name of any person not already listed as a candidate for that office, and such indication and insertion shall count as a vote for that person for such office.* * *Section 1215. Method of Marking Ballots and Depositing Same in Districts in Which Ballots are Used.--* * *(b) At primaries, the elector shall prepare his ballot in the following manner: He shall vote for the candidates of his choice for nomination or election, according to the number of persons to be voted for by him, for each office, by making a cross (X) or check (✓) mark in the square opposite the name of the candidate, or he may insert by writing or stamping in the blank space provided therefor, any name not already printed on the ballot, and such insertion shall count as a vote without the making of a cross (X) or check (✓) mark. In districts in which paper ballots or ballot cards are electronically tabulated, stickers or labels may not be used to mark ballots. In a county, city, borough, township, school district or other municipality or incorporated district contained in any county using ranked choice voting, ballots shall be marked as described in section 20250HB0123PN2557 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 604.1.(c) At elections, the elector shall prepare his ballot in the following manner: He may vote for the candidates of his choice for each office to be filled according to the number of persons to be voted for by him for each office, by making a cross (X) or check (✓) mark in the square opposite the name of the candidate, or he may insert by writing or stamping in the blank spaces provided therefor, any name not already printed on the ballot, and such insertion shall count as a vote without the making of a cross (X) or check (✓) mark. In districts in which paper ballots or ballot cards are electronically tabulated, stickers or labels may not be used to mark ballots. If he desires to vote for every candidate of a political party or political body, except its candidates for offices as to which he votes for individual candidates in the manner hereinafter provided, he may make a cross (X) or check (✓) mark in the square opposite the name of the party or political body of his choice in the party column on the left of the ballot, and every such cross (X) or check (✓) mark shall be equivalent to and be counted as a vote for every candidate of a party or political body so marked, including its candidates for presidential electors, except for those offices as to which he has indicated a choice for individual candidates of the same or another party or political body, by making a cross (X) or check (✓) mark opposite their names in the manner hereinabove provided, as to which offices his ballot shall be counted only for the candidates which he has thus individually marked, notwithstanding the fact that he made a mark in the party column, and even though in the case of an office for which more than one candidate is to be voted for, he has not individually 20250HB0123PN2557 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 marked for such office the full number of candidates for which he is entitled to vote. If he desires to vote for the entire group of presidential electors nominated by any party or political body, he may make a cross (X) or check (✓) mark in the appropriate square at the right of the names of the candidates for President and Vice-President of such party or body. If he desires to vote a ticket for presidential electors made up of the names of persons nominated by different parties or political bodies, or partially of names of persons so in nomination and partially of names of persons not in nomination by any party or political body, or wholly of names of persons not in nomination by any party or political body, he shall insert, by writing or stamping, the names of the candidates for presidential electors for whom he desires to vote in the blank spaces provided therefor under the title of the office "Presidential Electors." In case of a question submitted to the vote of the electors, he may make a cross (X) or check (✓) mark in the appropriate square opposite the answer which he desires to give. In a county, city, borough, township, school district or other municipality or incorporated district contained in any county using ranked choice voting, ballots shall be marked as described in section 604.1.* * *Section 4. Section 1222 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1222. Count and Return of Votes in Districts in Which Ballots are Used.--* * *(a.1) In a county, city, borough, township, school district or other municipality or incorporated district contained in any 20250HB0123PN2557 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county using ranked choice voting, each ballot shall be transported securely to the elections department as described in section 1225(a) and processed as described in section 604.1.* * *Section 5. Section 1417 of the act is amended to read:Section 1417. Persons Receiving Highest Number of Votes to Be Declared Elected.--Except as otherwise provided by law, the persons receiving the highest number of votes for any office at any election shall be declared elected to such office, up to the number required by law to be elected thereto. In elections using ranked choice voting as described in section 604.1, the person receiving the highest number of votes is to be determined at the completion of the ranked choice voting calculation.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0123PN2557 - 14 - 1234567891011121314